North Carolina, session 2025, SB348.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. TITLE
SECTION 1.1. This act shall be known as "The Home Comfort Act."

PART II. DEFINITIONS
SECTION 2.1. The following definitions apply in this act:
(1) Department. – The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of
Aging.
(2) Eligible senior. – A resident of North Carolina who is 65 years of age or older
with a household income at or below two hundred fifty percent (250%) of the
federal poverty level.

PART III. HOME MODIFICATION GRANT PROGRAM
SECTION 3.1.(a) Effective July 1, 2025, there is appropriated from the General
Fund to the Department the sum of seven million dollars ($7,000,000) in recurring funds for each
year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to establish and administer a Home Modification Grant
Program (Program). The purpose of the Program is to provide State-funded financial assistance
to eligible seniors to make essential home modifications to a primary residence to improve
accessibility and safety, including, but not limited to, all of the following:
(1) Installation of wheelchair ramps.
(2) Bathroom safety improvements, such as grab bars and walk-in showers.
(3) Widening of doorways for mobility assistance.
*S348-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(4) Stairlifts and handrail installations.
SECTION 3.1.(b) The Department shall establish an application process and
eligibility criteria for participation in the Program. In addition, the Department shall make the
final decision about the amount of financial assistance to award to each eligible senior and the
specific essential home modifications approved, subject to all of the following requirements:
(1) Each recipient of financial assistance under the Program shall meet at least all
of the following criteria:
a. Is 65 years of age or older.
b. Has a household income at or below two hundred fifty percent (250%)
of the federal poverty level.
(2) No single household may receive more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in
financial assistance.
(3) In selecting eligible seniors for financial assistance, the Department shall give
priority to eligible seniors residing in rural and underserved communities.
(4) Program participants are required to engage contractors who hold a valid
North Carolina general contractor's license to perform the essential home
modifications funded by the Program, and the Department shall give priority
to contractors who are certified aging-in-place specialists or Americans With
Disabilities Act-certified contractors.
SECTION 3.1.(c) The Department may use up to five percent (5%) of the funds
authorized by this section for each fiscal year for administrative purposes associated with
administering the Program.
SECTION 3.2. The Department shall begin accepting applications for the Program
on or before January 1, 2026.

PART IV. SUPPORTIVE IN-HOME SERVICES
SECTION 4.1. Effective July 1, 2025, there is appropriated to the Department the
sum of forty-two million two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($42,250,000) in recurring funds for
each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to be allocated and used for all of the following:
(1) To provide increased funding for existing programs that aid eligible seniors
with their daily activities, personal care, and household maintenance.
(2) To provide State-funded financial assistance to eligible seniors for home
health agency services. As used in this section, a home health agency is an
agency certified to receive Medicare and Medicaid reimbursement for
providing nursing care, therapy, medical social services, and home health aide
services.
(3) To provide grants to Area Agencies on Aging, county departments of social
services, and local health departments to implement or expand home care
independence services for eligible seniors to help them to remain safely in
their home settings.
(4) To establish a Caregiver Assistance Program that provides a monthly stipend
of up to five hundred dollars ($500.00) to a family member who provides
in-home care to an eligible senior. The Department shall establish an
application process and eligibility criteria for participation in the Caregiver
Assistance Program. In addition, the Department shall determine the amount
of the monthly stipend for each applicant. In determining the amount of the
monthly stipend, the Department shall consider an assessment of care needs
performed by a licensed physician. Each recipient of financial assistance
under the Caregiver Assistance Program shall meet at least all of the following
criteria:
a. Is 65 years of age or older.
Page 2 Senate Bill 348-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
b. Has a household income at or below two hundred fifty percent (250%)
of the federal poverty level.

PART V. AGING-IN-PLACE RESOURCES
SECTION 5.1. Effective July 1, 2025, there is appropriated from the General Fund
to the Department the sum of seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000) in recurring funds
for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium and the sum of one million five hundred thousand
dollars ($1,500,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be allocated and used
as follows:
(1) One million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) in nonrecurring funds
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to develop and implement a statewide hotline
and online portal to assist eligible seniors with navigating the programs
included in the aging-in-place resource guide developed pursuant to
sub-subdivision (2)b. of this section. The Department shall work toward
making the hotline and online portal fully operational by December 1, 2026.
(2) Seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000) in recurring funds for each
year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to accomplish both of the following:
a. To pay for ongoing operational expenses and maintenance associated
with the statewide hotline and online portal implemented pursuant to
subdivision (1) of this section.
b. To develop, update annually, and distribute free of charge to eligible
seniors and their families an aging-in-place resource guide that
contains information, guidance, and planning support regarding home
adaptations, long-term care options, safety assessments, and
State-funded programs to assist eligible seniors with aging in place at
home, including the Home Modification Grant Program established by
Section 3.1 of this act.

PART VI. REPORTING REQUIREMENTS
SECTION 6.1. Annually by April 1, beginning April 1, 2027, the Department shall
submit a report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and
the Fiscal Research Division on the use of the funds appropriated by this act during the preceding
fiscal year. Except as otherwise provided, each report shall include at least all of the following:
(1) For the first report due on April 1, 2027, an explanation of the eligibility
criteria established by the Department for any newly established programs.
(2) The total number of grants awarded to Area Agencies on Aging, county
departments of social services, and local health departments to implement or
expand home care independence services for eligible seniors to help them to
remain safely in their home settings; the identity of each grant recipient; and
the amount of grant funds awarded to each recipient.
(3) The total amount of State financial assistance awarded to eligible seniors
pursuant to this act, broken down by program.
(4) The specific home modifications funded for each Home Modification Grant
recipient and the costs associated with these modifications.

PART VII. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 7.1. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Senate Bill 348-First Edition Page 3